Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 7. County Surveyors

Cross references. —

For duty of county surveyors as to boundary disputes, see §§

18-1-401

to

18-1-407

.

As to bonds of county officers generally, see §

18-3-102

.

For duty of county commissioners to provide county officers with stationery and supplies, see §

18-3-514

.

For duty of county surveyors as to highways generally, see title 24.

As to surveyors and engineers generally, see §§ 33-29-114 through 33-29-139.

For authority of county surveyor relative to the platting, etc., of plats vacated in connection with the establishment of town sites, see §

34-12-111

.

§ 18-3-701.
Qualifications; appointment; duty as supervisor of roads.

Each board of county commissioners may appoint a county surveyor who is a licensed engineer or surveyor of the state of Wyoming. The board of county commissioners may also appoint the county surveyor to be the county supervisor of roads. If no licensed surveyor or engineer is available the board of county commissioners may appoint some other competent person to act as supervisor of roads.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VII, § 1; 1886, ch. 58, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1889; R.S. 1899, § 1184; C.S. 1910, § 1290; C.S. 1920, § 1542; Laws 1925, ch. 31, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 30-1001; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 6; 1945, ch. 147, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-1201; W.S. 1957, § 18-192; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The basic law establishing county offices and government was ch. 28, C.L. 1876.

Chapter 85, Laws 1937, was a general law relating to terms of county officers.

§ 18-3-702.
Duty to make county surveys and keep plats.

The county surveyor shall:

Conduct all surveys in and for his county and keep a plat of all official surveys made by him on file in his office in strict conformity to the field notes of the survey;

File a copy of a plat of legally established county roads in the United States land office of the district in which the roads are located;

Execute any survey that is required by order of any court or upon application of any individual or corporation. The certificate of the county surveyor shall be admitted as legal evidence in any court of the state but the same may be explained or rebutted by other evidence.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VII, § 2; Laws 1886, ch. 58, § 2; R.S. 1887, §§ 1890, 1891; R.S. 1899, §§ 1185, 1186; Laws 1907, ch. 39, § 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 1291, 1292, 2592; C.S. 1920, §§ 1543, 1544, 3085; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-1002, 30-1003, 42-115; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-1202, 27-1203, 66-515; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-193 to 18-195; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For other provisions for survey of roads, see §§

24-1-102

and

24-3-109

.

As to platting and dedication, see §§

34-12-101

to

34-12-115

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

In general. —

In the absence of rebutting evidence, the surveyor's certificate is sufficient to warrant a finding of the court in favor of one claiming under it. Pool v. Baker, 23 Wyo. 539, 154 P. 328,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1916).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1909).

§ 18-3-703.
Records to be kept; copies to be furnished upon request; duty to file plats, maps and records of surveys made for county with county clerk; penalty for failure to file such records; authority of county commissioners to purchase records of private surveys.

The county surveyor shall keep a correct record of all surveys made by him in a book provided by the county which he shall transmit to his successor in office. He shall number each survey progressively and shall preserve a copy of field notes and calculations of each survey endorsing thereon its proper number. A copy of the survey and an accurate plat thereof, together with a certificate of survey shall be furnished by the surveyor to any person requiring the same.

Each county surveyor shall file with the county clerk of the county wherein the land surveyed is located all plats, maps and survey records of surveys made by him in behalf of the county, and shall make such filings continuously as surveys are completed. The county clerk and the county commissioners may invoke the aid of any district court in the state to secure possession of such documents as are in the custody of the county surveyors which are the property of the county.

It is unlawful for any county surveyor to fail to file plats, maps and survey records of surveys made as provided herein within thirty (30) days of the completion of the survey. Violators of this section are guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Each board of county commissioners may purchase for a reasonable sum survey records made by surveyors.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VII, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1892; R.S. 1899, § 1187; C.S. 1910, § 1293; C.S. 1920, § 1545; R.S. 1931, § 30-1004; C.S. 1945, § 27-1204; W.S. 1957, § 18-196; Laws 1965, ch. 153, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “Not later than June 1, 1965” at the beginning, and made a stylistic change; and in (c), deleted “or to file such plats, maps and survey records of surveys made after June 1, 1965” following “as provided herein.”

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Patrick, 18 Wyo. 130, 104 P. 531,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1909).

§ 18-3-704.
Establishment of lost corners.

Whenever the location of any monument which marks the corner of any tract or tracts of land is in dispute between the owners of the adjoining lands, the monument shall be established as follows:

The county surveyor of the county in which the corner is located or any registered land surveyor employed by one of the landowners shall immediately give notice in writing to all parties interested in the establishment of the corner, giving at least thirty (30) days notice and naming a day when he will make the necessary surveys to establish or restore the corner. If written notice cannot be made upon the owners or their agents because of nonresidence, then the notice shall be published once each week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county, or if there is no newspaper published in the county then in a newspaper of general circulation published nearest such county;

After the proper notice has been given the county surveyor or land surveyor shall on the day named in the notice proceed to reestablish or restore the corner after having determined by careful surveys and investigations that the original corner cannot be recovered or identified. He shall proceed in accordance with the surveying rules contained in the circular “Restoration of lost or obliterated corners” and the “manual of instructions for the survey of public lands”, issued by the general land office of the United States government. He shall firmly plant a suitable monument at the corner point or points so determined. He shall mark the same for the proper sections or tracts to which they refer and shall add a personal mark so the origin of the monument can be traced. He shall accurately take and note courses and distances referred to in the true meridian, and from the reestablished or restored points he shall record the bearing to one or more prominent objects of a permanent nature if any are in the vicinity;

He shall make a map or plat of the survey and record a copy of it together with a copy of the field notes, applications for survey, notice to and names of the interested parties and all other pertinent papers in the office of the county surveyor and county clerk in the county in which the land is located. He shall file a copy of the same papers in the public survey office, department of the interior, Cheyenne, Wyoming. The monument or monuments reestablished or restored shall be held to mark the original corner or corners and shall have the legal force and effect as stated in the original record of the survey;

Any registered land surveyor rendering service under this section is entitled to fees and other incident expense to be collected equally from all interested parties.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 83, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1189; C.S. 1910, § 1295; C.S. 1920, § 1546; Laws 1927, ch. 60, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 30-1005; C.S. 1945, § 27-1205; W.S. 1957, § 18-197; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Relocation of boundary. —

A party, against whom an injunction had been issued to enjoin entry of neighbor's inclosure, did not violate the injunction by entry on land in said inclosure on his side of the boundary, as relocated after the issuance of the injunction. Porter v. State, 16 Wyo. 131, 92 P. 385,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1907).

Cited

in

Hagerman v. Thompson, 68 Wyo. 515, 235 P.2d 750,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1951).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of showing, in establishing boundary by parol agreement, that boundary was uncertain or in dispute before agreement, 72 ALR4th 132.

§ 18-3-705.
Compensation of surveyor; appointment and compensation of road supervisor in case surveyor does not act.

The county surveyor in each county shall receive for each day actually employed by the county an amount not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00) per day. If the county surveyor does not act as road supervisor as provided by W.S.

18-3-701

, the board of county commissioners may appoint a county road supervisor and shall fix his salary at a sum not exceeding six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) per annum. No county commissioner shall be appointed county road supervisor.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 76, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 1189; C.S. 1910, § 1295; C.S. 1920, § 1547; R.S. 1931, § 30-1006; Laws 1945, ch. 147, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 27-1206; Laws 1947, ch. 151, § 1; 1953, ch. 98, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-198; Laws 1961, ch. 167, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision that legislature shall designate county officers and fix salaries of county officers, see art. 14, § 3, Wyo. Const.